Washington statutes.
RCW 36.16.090

Office space.

The boards of county commissioners of the several counties of the state shall provide a suitable furnished office for each of the county officers in their respective courthouses and may provide additional offices elsewhere for the officers at the board's discretion.

[ 2009 c 105 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.16.090. Prior: 1893 c 82 s 1; Code 1881 s 2677; 1869 p 306 s 15; 1854 p 422 s 15; RRS s 4032. SLC-RO-14.]